Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1093.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2383XC (2) 91 sb/js S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 481A.90, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. This section does not prohibit the owner or ownerâs agent 3 from destroying a den or breaching or altering a beaver dam to 4 protect the ownerâs property. 5 Sec. 2. Section 481A.92, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 6 to read as follows: 7 1. A person shall not use or attempt to use colony traps in 8 taking, capturing, trapping, or killing any game or fur-bearing 9 animals except muskrats as determined by rule of the 10 commission. Box traps capable of capturing more than one game 11 or fur-bearing animal at each setting are prohibited. A valid 12 hunting license is required for box trapping cottontail rabbits 13 and squirrels. All traps and snares used for the taking of 14 fur-bearing animals shall have a metal tag attached plainly 15 labeled with the userâs department-issued identification number 16 or name and address. All traps and snares, except those which 17 that are placed entirely under water, shall be checked at 18 least once every twenty-four hours. Officers appointed by the 19 department may confiscate such traps and snares found in use 20 that are not properly labeled or checked. 21 Sec. 3. Section 481A.95, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 22 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 23 following: 24 2. Fees for a license issued under this section shall 25 be no more than fifty dollars annually for a resident or a 26 nonresident fur dealer. 27